Washington statutes.
RCW 43.05.020

Agency programs—List of technical assistance providers.

All regulatory agencies shall develop programs to encourage voluntary compliance by providing technical assistance consistent with statutory requirements. The programs shall include but are not limited to technical assistance visits, printed information, information and assistance by telephone, training meetings, and other appropriate methods to provide technical assistance. In addition, all regulatory agencies shall provide upon request a list of organizations, including private companies, that provide technical assistance. This list shall be compiled by the agencies from information submitted by the organizations and shall not constitute an endorsement by an agency of any organization.

[ 1995 c 403 s 603.]